Utah statutes.
32A-4a-502 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Enforcement of operational restrictions
for a resort license or sublicense.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and in addition to Subsection
(3), failure by a person described in Subsection (1)(b) to comply with this
chapter or an operational restriction under a provision applicable to a
sublicense may result in:
(i)  a suspension or revocation of the resort license;
(ii)  a fine or other administrative sanction permitted under this title; or
(iii)  other disciplinary action taken against an individual employee or
management personnel of a resort licensee.
(b)  This Subsection (1) applies to:
(i)  a resort licensee;
(ii)  a person operating under a sublicense;
(iii)  an employee of a resort licensee or other person operating under a
sublicense;
(iv)  an agent of a resort licensee or other person operating under a
sublicense; or
(v)  personnel management of a resort licensee or other person operating under
a sublicense.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter and Section
32A-1-119, if the failure to comply with this chapter described in Subsection
(1) relates to an offer to sell, sell, service, or furnishing of an alcoholic
beverage on a sublicense premises, a resort licensee or an individual member
of the resort licensee's management personnel is subject to a sanction
described in Subsection (1), only if the commission finds that:
(i)  during the three years before the day on which the commission makes the
finding, there is three or more disciplinary proceedings against any person
operating under a sublicense of the resort licensee for failure to comply with
an operational restriction applicable to the sublicense; and
(ii)  the resort licensee has not taken reasonable steps to prevent persons
operating under a sublicense of the resort licensee from failing to comply
with operational restrictions applicable to the sublicense.
(b)  This Subsection (2) applies if the three or more disciplinary proceedings
described in Subsection (2)(a) are against:
(i)  the same person operating under a sublicense of the resort licensee; or
(ii)  two or more different persons operating under a sublicense of the resort
licensee.
(3)  An operational restriction applicable to a person operating under a
sublicense is enforced as provided by the provisions applicable to the
sublicense.
